South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1158.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 140 Genetic Modification of Human Embryos Section 44-140-10. No practitioner or facility shall knowingly perform, attempt to perform, or assist in the performance of genetic modification that alters the biological sex of a human embryo. Section 44-140-20. (A) A person who violates Section 44-140-10 is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than twenty thousand dollars or imprisoned not more than ten years, or both, and the person's professional license must be revoked by the applicable licensing body. (B) Each alteration of the biological sex of a human embryo in violation of Section 44-140-10 shall constitute a separate offense for purposes of this chapter. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----